California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.   (SB 545)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

707.01.

(a) If a minor is found an unfit subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law pursuant to Section 707, then the following shall apply:

(1) The jurisdiction of the juvenile court with respect to any previous adjudication resulting in the minor being made a ward of the juvenile court that did not result in the minor’s commitment to the Youth Authority shall not terminate, unless a hearing is held pursuant to Section 785 and the jurisdiction of the
 juvenile court over the minor is terminated.

(2) The jurisdiction of the juvenile court and the Youth Authority with respect to any previous adjudication resulting in the minor being made a ward of the juvenile court that resulted in the minor’s commitment to the Youth Authority shall not terminate.

(3) All petitions pending against the minor shall be transferred to the court of criminal jurisdiction where one of the following applies:

(A) Jeopardy has not attached and the minor was 16 years of age or older at the time he or she is alleged to have violated the criminal statute or ordinance.

(B) Jeopardy has not attached and the minor is alleged to have violated a criminal statute for which he or she may be presumed or may be found to be not a fit and
 proper subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law.

(4) All petitions pending against the minor shall be disposed of in the juvenile court pursuant to the juvenile court law, where one of the following applies:

(A) Jeopardy has attached.

(B) The minor was under 16 years of age at the time he or she is alleged to have violated a criminal statute for which he or she may not be presumed or may not be found to be not a fit and proper subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law.

(5) If, subsequent to a finding that a minor is an unfit subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law, the minor is convicted of the violations which were the subject of the proceeding that resulted in a finding of unfitness, a new petition or petitions
 alleging the violation of any law or ordinance defining crime which would otherwise cause the minor to be a person described in Section 602 committed by the minor prior to or after the finding of unfitness need not be filed in the juvenile court if one of the following applies:

(A) The minor was 16 years of age or older at the time he or she is alleged to have violated a criminal statute or ordinance.

(B) The minor is alleged to have violated a criminal statute for which he or she may be presumed or may be found to be not a fit and proper subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law.

(6) Subsequent to a finding that a minor is an unfit subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law, which finding was based solely on either or both the minor’s previous delinquent history or a lack of success of
 previous attempts by the juvenile court to rehabilitate the minor, and the minor was not convicted of the offense, a new petition or petitions alleging the violation of any law or ordinance defining crime which would otherwise cause the minor to be a person described in Section 602 committed by the minor prior to or after the finding of unfitness need not be filed in the juvenile court if one of the following applies:

(A) The minor was 16 years of age or older at the time he or she is alleged to have violated a criminal statute or ordinance.

(B) The minor is alleged to have violated a criminal statute for which he or she may be presumed or may be found to be not a fit and proper subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law.

(7) If, subsequent to a finding that a minor is an unfit subject to be dealt with
 under the juvenile court law, the minor is not convicted of the violations which were the subject of the proceeding that resulted in a finding of unfitness and the finding of unfitness was not based solely on either or both the minor’s previous delinquent history or a lack of success of previous attempts by the juvenile court to rehabilitate the minor, a new petition or petitions alleging the violation of any law or ordinance defining a crime which would otherwise cause the minor to be a person described in Section 602 committed by the minor prior to or after the finding of unfitness shall be first filed in the juvenile court. This paragraph does not preclude the prosecuting attorney from seeking to find the minor unfit in a subsequent petition.

(b) As to a violation referred to in paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (a), if a petition based on those violations has already been filed in the juvenile court, it shall be transferred to the court
 of criminal jurisdiction without any further proceedings.

(c) The probation officer shall not be required to investigate or submit a report regarding the fitness of a minor for any charge specified in paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (a) which is refiled in the juvenile court.

(d) This section shall not be construed to affect the right to appellate review of a finding of unfitness or the duration of the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as specified in Section 607.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 453, Sec. 10.8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

707.1.

(a) If, pursuant to a transfer hearing, the minor’s case is transferred from juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction, the district attorney or other appropriate prosecuting officer may file an accusatory pleading against the minor in a court of criminal jurisdiction. The case shall proceed from that point according to the laws applicable to a criminal case. If a prosecution has been commenced in another court but has been suspended while juvenile court proceedings are being held, it shall be ordered that the proceedings upon that prosecution shall resume.

(b) A minor whose case is transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction shall, upon the conclusion of the transfer hearing, be entitled to release on bail or
 on their own recognizance on the same circumstances, terms, and conditions as an adult alleged to have committed the same offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 25.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

707.2.

Notwithstanding a finding made pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 707 that a minor is not amenable to rehabilitation while under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, if the court, during a transfer hearing pursuant to Section 707, receives evidence that the minor was trafficked, sexually abused, or sexually battered by the alleged victim prior to or during the commission of the alleged offense, the minor shall be retained under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
 person against whom the minor is accused of committing an offense did not traffic, sexually abuse, or sexually batter the minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.   (SB 545)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

707.4.

In any case arising under this article in which there is no conviction in the criminal court, the clerk of the criminal court shall report such disposition to the juvenile court, to the probation department, to the law enforcement agency which arrested the minor for the offense which resulted in his remand to criminal court, and to the Department of Justice. Unless the minor has had a prior conviction in a criminal court, the clerk of the criminal court shall deliver to the clerk of the juvenile court all copies of the minor’s record in criminal court and shall obliterate the minor’s name from any index or minute book maintained in the criminal court. The clerk of the
 juvenile court shall maintain the minor’s criminal court record as provided by Article 22 (commencing with Section 825) of this chapter until such time as the juvenile court may issue an order that they be sealed pursuant to Section 781.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

707.5.

(a) In any case in which a person is transferred from juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction pursuant to Section 707, upon conviction or entry of a plea, the person may, under the circumstances described in subdivision (b), request the criminal court to return the case to the juvenile court for disposition.

(b) Upon motion by the person, the criminal court shall have the authority to return the case to juvenile court for disposition in the following circumstances:

(1) If the person is convicted at trial in criminal court solely of a misdemeanor or misdemeanors, upon request by the defense, the case shall be
 returned to juvenile court, as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e).

(2) If the court receives evidence that the minor was trafficked, sexually abused, or sexually battered by the alleged victim prior to or during the commission of the alleged offense, the case shall be returned to juvenile court, as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), unless the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the person against whom the charged
 offense was committed had not sexually abused, sexually battered, or trafficked the minor prior to or during the commission of the alleged offense. This paragraph shall be construed to prioritize the successful treatment and rehabilitation of minor victims of human trafficking and sex crimes who commit acts of violence against their abusers. It is the intent of the Legislature that these minors be viewed as victims and provided treatment and services in the juvenile or family court system. 

(3) If any of the allegations in the juvenile court petition that were the basis for transfer involved an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, and the person is convicted at trial in criminal court only of felony offenses that are not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, or a combination of such felony offenses and misdemeanors,
 upon request by the defense, the court shall have the discretion to return the case to juvenile court for further proceedings pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) If the allegations in the juvenile court petition that were the basis for transfer involved only offenses not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, and pursuant to a plea agreement the person pleads guilty only to a misdemeanor or misdemeanors, or if any of the allegations in the juvenile court petition that were the basis for transfer involved an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, and pursuant to a plea agreement the person pleads guilty only to a misdemeanor or misdemeanors, felony offenses that are not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, or a combination of such felony offenses and misdemeanors, upon agreement and request of the parties, and subject to the
 approval of the court, the case shall be returned to juvenile court for further proceedings pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) In determining whether the case should be returned to juvenile court pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), or in determining whether to approve the agreement pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the court shall make a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that a juvenile disposition is in the interests of justice and the welfare of the person, and shall so state on the minute order with the specific reasons for making that
 finding. In making the determination, the court shall consider the transcript and minute order of the transfer hearing, the time that the person has served in custody, the dispositions and services available to the person in the juvenile court, and any relevant evidence submitted by either party. A case that is ordered returned to juvenile court shall comply with subdivisions (d) and (e).

(d) Upon determining that the case shall be returned to the juvenile court, the court shall return the entire case to the juvenile court and the matter shall be calendared within two court days.

(e) The juvenile court shall order the probation department to prepare a social study on the questions of the proper disposition, and the case shall proceed to disposition as set forth in Sections 702,
 706, 706.5, and 730, and Article 18 (commencing with Section 725), as applicable. A conviction or guilty plea that is returned to juvenile court shall be considered an adjudication or admission before the juvenile court for all purposes.

(f) The clerk of the criminal court shall report the return to juvenile court to the probation department, the law enforcement agency that arrested the minor for the offense, and the Department of Justice. The clerk of the criminal court shall deliver to the clerk of the juvenile court all copies of the minor’s record in criminal court and shall obliterate the person’s name for any index maintained in the criminal court. The clerk of the juvenile court shall maintain the criminal court records as provided by Article 22 (commencing with Section 825) until such time as the juvenile court may issue an order that
 the records be sealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.   (SB 545)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

708.

(a) Whenever a minor who appears to be a danger to himself or herself or others as a result of the use of controlled substances (as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code), is brought before any judge of the juvenile court, the judge may continue the hearing and proceed pursuant to this section. The court may order the minor taken to a facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation. Thereupon the provisions of Section 5343 shall apply, except that the professional person in charge of the facility shall make a written report to the court concerning the results of the evaluation of the minor.

(b) If the professional person in charge of the facility for 72-hour evaluation and treatment reports to the juvenile court that the minor is not a danger to himself or herself or others as a result of the use of controlled substances or that the minor does not require 14-day intensive treatment, or if the minor has been certified for not more than 14 days of intensive treatment and the certification is terminated, the minor shall be released if the juvenile court proceedings have been dismissed; referred for further care and treatment on a voluntary basis, subject to the disposition of the juvenile court proceedings; or returned to the juvenile court, in which event the court shall proceed with the case pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Any expenditure for the evaluation or intensive treatment of a minor under this section shall be considered an expenditure made under Part 2 (commencing
 with Section 5600) of Division 5, and shall be reimbursed by the state as are other local expenditures pursuant to that part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 28.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

709.

(a) (1) If the court has a doubt that a minor who is subject to any juvenile proceedings is competent, the court shall suspend all proceedings and proceed pursuant to this section.

(2) A minor is incompetent for purposes of this section if the minor
 lacks sufficient present ability to consult with counsel and assist in preparing the minor’s defense with a reasonable degree of rational understanding, or lacks a rational as well as factual understanding of the nature of the charges or proceedings against them. Incompetency may result from the presence of any condition or conditions, including, but not limited to, mental illness, mental disorder, developmental disability, or developmental immaturity. Except as specifically provided otherwise, this section applies to a minor who is alleged to come within the jurisdiction of the court pursuant
 to Section 601 or 602.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), during the pendency of any juvenile proceeding, the court may receive information from any source regarding the minor’s ability to understand the proceedings. The minor’s counsel or the court may express a doubt as to the minor’s competency. If the court finds substantial evidence that raises a doubt as to the minor’s competency, the proceedings shall be suspended.

(b) (1) Unless the parties stipulate to a finding that the minor lacks competency, or the parties are willing to submit on the issue of the minor’s lack of competency, the court shall appoint an expert to evaluate the minor and determine whether the minor suffers from a mental illness, mental disorder, developmental disability, developmental immaturity, or other condition affecting competency and, if so, whether the minor is incompetent as
 defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) The expert shall have expertise in child and adolescent development and forensic evaluation of juveniles for purposes of adjudicating competency, shall be familiar with competency standards and accepted criteria used in evaluating juvenile competency, shall have received training in conducting juvenile competency evaluations, and shall be familiar with competency remediation for the condition or conditions affecting competence in the particular case.

(3) The expert shall personally interview the minor and review all of the available records provided, including, but not limited to, medical, education, special education, probation, child welfare, mental health, regional center, and court records, and any other relevant information that is available. The expert shall consult with the minor’s counsel and any other person who has
 provided information to the court regarding the minor’s lack of competency. The expert shall gather a developmental history of the minor. If any information is unavailable to the expert, the expert shall note in the report the efforts to obtain that information. The expert shall administer age-appropriate testing specific to the issue of competency unless the facts of the particular case render testing unnecessary or inappropriate. The expert shall be proficient in the language preferred by the minor, or, if that is not feasible, the expert shall employ the services of a certified interpreter and use assessment tools that are linguistically and culturally appropriate for the minor. In a written report, the expert shall opine whether the minor has the sufficient present ability to consult with
 the minor’s counsel with a reasonable degree of rational understanding and whether the minor has a rational and factual understanding of the proceedings against them. The expert shall also state the basis for these conclusions. If the expert concludes that the minor lacks competency, the expert shall give their opinion on whether the minor is likely to attain competency in
 the foreseeable future, and, if so, make recommendations regarding the type of remediation services that would be effective in assisting the minor in attaining competency.

(4) The Judicial Council, in conjunction with groups or individuals representing judges, defense counsel, district attorneys, chief probation officers, counties, advocates for people with developmental and mental disabilities, experts in special education testing, psychologists and psychiatrists specializing in adolescents, professional associations and accredited bodies for psychologists and psychiatrists, and other interested stakeholders, shall adopt a rule of court identifying the training and experience needed for an expert to be competent in forensic evaluations of juveniles. The Judicial Council shall develop and adopt rules for the implementation of the other requirements in this subdivision.

(5) Statements made to the appointed expert during the minor’s competency evaluation and statements made by the minor to mental health professionals during the remediation proceedings, and any fruits of these statements, shall not be used in any other hearing against the minor in either juvenile or adult court.

(6) The district attorney or minor’s counsel may retain or seek the appointment of additional qualified experts who may testify during the competency hearing. The expert’s report and qualifications shall be disclosed to the opposing party within a reasonable time before, but no later than five court days before, the hearing. If disclosure is not made in accordance with this paragraph, the court may make any order necessary to enforce the provisions of this paragraph, including, but not limited to, immediate disclosure, contempt proceedings, delaying or prohibiting the testimony of the expert or consideration of the expert’s
 report upon a showing of good cause, or any other lawful order. If, after disclosure of the report, the opposing party requests a continuance in order to further prepare for the hearing and shows good cause for the continuance, the court shall grant a continuance for a reasonable period of time. This paragraph does not allow a qualified expert retained or appointed by the district attorney to perform a competency evaluation on a minor without an order from the juvenile court after petitioning the court for an order pursuant to the Civil Discovery Act (Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure).

(7) If the expert believes the minor is developmentally disabled, the court shall appoint the director of a regional center for developmentally disabled individuals described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 4620) of Chapter 5 of Division 4.5, or
 the director’s designee, to evaluate the minor. The director of the regional center, or the director’s designee, shall determine whether the minor is eligible for services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)), and shall provide the court with a written report informing the court of his or her determination. The court’s appointment of the director of the regional center for determination of eligibility for services shall not delay the court’s proceedings for determination of competency.

(8) An expert’s opinion that a minor is developmentally disabled does not supersede an independent determination by the regional center whether the minor is
 eligible for services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)).

(9) This section does not authorize or require determinations regarding the competency of a minor by the director of the regional center or the director’s designee.

(c) The question of the minor’s competency shall be determined at an evidentiary hearing unless there is a stipulation or submission by the parties on the findings of the
 expert that the minor is incompetent. It shall be presumed that the minor is mentally competent, unless it is proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the minor is mentally incompetent. With respect to a minor under 14 years of age at the time of the commission of the alleged offense, the court shall make a determination as to the minor’s capacity pursuant to Section 26 of the Penal Code prior to deciding the issue of competency.

(d) If the court finds the minor to be competent, the court shall reinstate proceedings and proceed commensurate with the court’s jurisdiction.

(e) If the court finds, by a preponderance of evidence, that the minor is incompetent, all proceedings shall remain suspended for a period of time that is no longer than reasonably necessary to determine whether there is a substantial probability that the minor will attain competency in the foreseeable
 future, or the court no longer retains jurisdiction and the case must be dismissed. Prior to a dismissal, the court may make orders that it deems appropriate for services. Further, the court may rule on motions that do not require the participation of the minor in the preparation of the motions. These motions include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Motions to dismiss.

(2) Motions regarding a change in the placement of the minor.

(3) Detention hearings.

(4) Demurrers.

(f) If the minor is found to be incompetent and the petition contains only misdemeanor offenses, the petition shall be dismissed.

(g) (1) Upon a finding of incompetency, the court shall refer the minor to services designed to help the minor attain competency, unless the court finds that competency cannot be achieved within the foreseeable future. The court may also refer the minor to treatment services to assist in remediation that may include, but are not limited to, mental health services, treatment for trauma, medically supervised medication, behavioral counseling, curriculum-based legal education, or training in socialization skills, consistent with any laws requiring consent. Service providers and evaluators shall adhere to the standards stated in this section and the California Rules of Court. Services shall be provided in the least restrictive environment consistent with public safety, as determined by the court. A finding of incompetency alone shall not be the basis for secure confinement. The minor shall be returned to court at the earliest possible date. The court shall review remediation services at least every 30
 calendar days for minors in custody and every 45 calendar days for minors out of custody prior to the expiration of the total remediation period specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h). If the minor is in custody, the county mental health department shall provide the court with suitable alternatives for the continued delivery of remediation services upon release from custody as part of the court’s review of remediation services. The court shall consider appropriate alternatives to juvenile hall confinement, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Placement through regional centers.

(B) Short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(C) Crisis residential programs.

(D) Civil commitment.

(E) Foster care, relative placement, or other nonsecure placement.

(F) Other residential treatment programs.

(2) The court may make any orders necessary to assist with the delivery of remediation services in an alternative setting to secure confinement.

(h) (1) Within six months of the initial receipt of a recommendation by the designated person or entity, the court shall hold an evidentiary hearing on whether the minor is remediated or is able to be remediated unless the parties stipulate to, or agree to the recommendation of, the remediation program. If the recommendation is that the minor has attained competency, and if the minor disputes that recommendation, the burden is on the minor to prove by a preponderance of evidence that he or she remains incompetent. If the recommendation is that the minor is unable to be remediated and if the prosecutor disputes that recommendation, the burden is on the prosecutor to prove by a preponderance of evidence that the minor is
 remediable. If the prosecution contests the evaluation of continued incompetence, the minor shall be presumed incompetent and the prosecution shall have the burden to prove by a preponderance of evidence that the minor is competent. The provisions of subdivision (c) shall apply at this stage of the proceedings.

(2) If the court finds that the minor has been remediated, the court shall reinstate the proceedings.

(3) If the court finds that the minor has not yet been remediated, but is likely to be remediated within six months, the court shall order the minor to return to the remediation program. However, the total remediation period shall not exceed one year from the finding of incompetency and secure confinement shall not exceed the limit specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5).

(4) If the court finds that the
 minor will not achieve competency within six months, the court shall dismiss the petition. The court may invite persons and agencies with information about the minor, including, but not limited to, the minor and the minor’s attorney, the probation department, parents, guardians, or relative caregivers, mental health treatment professionals, the public guardian, educational rights holders, education providers, and social services agencies, to the dismissal hearing to discuss any services that may be available to the minor after jurisdiction is terminated. If appropriate, the court shall refer the minor for evaluation pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 or Article 3 (commencing with Section 6550) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6.

(5) (A)   Secure confinement shall not extend beyond six months from the finding of incompetence, except as provided in this section. In making that determination, the court shall consider all of the following:

(i) Where the minor will have the best chance of obtaining competence.

(ii) Whether the placement is the least restrictive setting appropriate for the minor.

(iii) Whether alternatives to secure confinement have been identified and pursued and why alternatives are not available or appropriate.

(iv) Whether the placement is necessary for the safety of the minor or others.

(B) If the court determines, upon consideration of
 these factors, that it is in the best interests of the minor and the public’s safety for the minor to remain in secure confinement, the court shall state the reasons on the record.

(C) Only in cases where the petition involves an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 may the court consider whether it is necessary and in the best interests of the minor and the public’s safety to order secure confinement of a minor for up to an additional year, not to exceed 18 months from the finding of incompetence.

(i) The presiding judge of the juvenile court, the probation department, the county mental health department, the public defender and any other entity that provides representation for minors, the district attorney, the regional center, if appropriate, and any other participants that the presiding judge shall designate, shall develop a written protocol describing the
 competency process and a program to ensure that minors who are found incompetent receive appropriate remediation services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   (AB 439)   Effective July 31, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

710.

(a) Sections 711, 712, and 713 shall not be applicable in a county unless the application of those sections in the county has been approved by a resolution adopted by the board of supervisors. A county may establish a program pursuant to Section 711, 712, or 713, or pursuant to two or all three of those sections, on a permanent basis, or it may establish the program on a limited duration basis for a specific number of years. Moneys from a grant from the Mental Health Services Act used to fund a program pursuant to Section 711, 712, or 713 may be
 used only for services related to mental health assessment, treatment, and evaluation.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that in a county where funding exists through the Mental Health Services Act, and the board of supervisors has adopted a resolution pursuant to subdivision (a), the courts may, under the guidelines established in Section 711, make available the evaluation described in Section 712, and receive treatment and placement recommendations from the multidisciplinary assessment team as described in Section 713.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 265, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

(a) When it appears to the court, or upon request of the prosecutor or counsel for the minor, at any time, that a minor who is alleged to come within the jurisdiction of the court under Section 602, may have a serious mental disorder, is seriously emotionally disturbed, or has a developmental disability, the court may order that the minor be referred for evaluation, as described in Section 712.

(b) A minor, with the approval of his or her counsel, may decline the referral for mental
 health evaluation described in Section 712 or the multidisciplinary team review described in Section 713, in which case the matter shall proceed without the application of Sections 712 and 713, and in accordance with all other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 265, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

(a) The evaluation ordered by the court under Section 711 shall be made, in accordance with the provisions of Section 741 and Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500), by either of the following, as applicable:

(1) For minors suspected to be developmentally disabled, by the director of a regional center or his or her designee, pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 709.

(2) For all other minors, by an appropriate and licensed mental health professional who meets one or more of the following criteria:

(A) The person is licensed to practice medicine in
 the State of California and is trained and actively engaged in the practice of psychiatry.

(B) The person is licensed as a psychologist under Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) The evaluator selected by the court shall personally examine the minor, conduct appropriate psychological or mental health screening, assessment, or testing, according to a uniform protocol developed by the county mental health department, and prepare and submit to the court a written report indicating his or her findings and recommendations to guide the court in determining whether the minor has a serious mental disorder or is seriously emotionally disturbed, as described in Section 5600.3. If the minor is detained, the examination
 shall occur within three court days of the court’s order of referral for evaluation, and the evaluator’s report shall be submitted to the court not later than five court days after the evaluator has personally examined the minor, unless the submission date is extended by the court for good cause shown.

(c) Based on the written report by the evaluator or the regional center, the court shall determine whether the minor has a serious mental disorder or is seriously emotionally disturbed, as described in Section 5600.3, or has a developmental disability, as defined in Section 4512. If the court determines that the minor has a serious mental disorder, is seriously emotionally disturbed, or has a developmental disability, the case shall proceed as described in Section 713. If the court determines that the minor does not have a serious mental
 disorder, is not seriously emotionally disturbed, or does not have a developmental disability, the matter shall proceed without the application of Section 713 and in accordance with all other applicable provisions of law.

(d) This section shall not be construed to interfere with the legal authority of the juvenile court or of any other public or private agency or individual to refer a minor for mental health evaluation or treatment as provided in Section 370, 635.1, 704, 741, 5150, 5694.7, 5699.2, 5867.5, or 6551 of this code, or in Section 4011.6 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 991, Sec. 3.   (AB 1214)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

(a) For any minor described in Section 711 who is determined by the court under Section 712 to be seriously emotionally disturbed, have a serious mental disorder, or have a developmental disability, and who is adjudicated a ward of the court under Section 602, the dispositional procedures set forth in this section shall apply.

(b) Prior to the preparation of the social study required under Section 706, 706.5, or 706.6, the minor shall be referred to a multidisciplinary team for
 dispositional review and recommendation. The multidisciplinary team shall consist of qualified persons who are collectively able to evaluate the minor’s full range of treatment needs and may include representatives from local probation, mental health, regional centers, regional resource development projects, child welfare, education, community-based youth services, and other agencies or service providers. The multidisciplinary team shall include at least one licensed mental health professional as described in subdivision (a) of Section 712. If the minor has been determined to have both a mental disorder and a developmental disorder, the multidisciplinary team may include both an appropriate mental health agency and a regional center.

(c) The multidisciplinary team shall review the nature and circumstances of the case, including the minor’s family circumstances, as well as the minor’s relevant tests, evaluations, records, medical and psychiatric
 history, and any existing individual education plan or individual program plans. The multidisciplinary team shall provide for the involvement of the minor’s available parent, guardian, or primary caretaker in its review, including any direct participation in multidisciplinary team proceedings as may be helpful or appropriate for development of a treatment plan in the case. The team shall identify the mental health or other treatment services, including in-home and community-based services that are available and appropriate for the minor, including services that may be available to the minor under federal and state programs and initiatives, such as wraparound service programs. At the conclusion of its review, the team shall then produce a recommended disposition and written treatment plan for the minor, to be appended to, or incorporated into, the probation social study presented to the court.

(d) The court shall review the treatment plan and
 the dispositional recommendations prepared by the multidisciplinary team and shall take them into account when making the dispositional order in the case. The dispositional order in the case shall be consistent with the protection of the public and the primary treatment needs of the minor as identified in the report of the multidisciplinary team. The minor’s disposition order shall incorporate, to the extent feasible, the treatment plan submitted by the multidisciplinary team, with any adjustments deemed appropriate by the court.

(e) The dispositional order in the case shall authorize placement of the minor in the least restrictive setting that is consistent with the protection of the public and the minor’s treatment needs, and with the treatment plan approved by the court. The court shall, in making the dispositional order, give preferential consideration to the return of the minor to the home of his or her family, guardian, or responsible
 relative with appropriate in-home, outpatient, or wraparound services, unless that action would be, in the reasonable judgment of the court, inconsistent with the need to protect the public or the minor, or with the minor’s treatment needs.
